Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 5

Trial Courts

16-2-501. Legislative purpose — Existing courts.

The general assembly expressly declares that its purpose in enacting this part is to reorganize the existing trial court system of this state in such a way that its growth occurs in a logical and orderly manner. It does not have as its purpose the abolition of any court or judicial office.

Nothing in this part shall be construed as altering, diminishing or abolishing chancery court or the constitutional and historical distinctions between chancery court and circuit court.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 26, provided that all other laws or parts of law in conflict with the provisions of ch. 931 were repealed.

Cross-References. Power of general assembly to create courts, Tenn. Const., art. VI, § 1.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 9.

Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 24.10, 24.17.

16-2-502. Titles of judges — Jurisdiction.

Each trial court judge shall continue to be officially known and designated as either a chancellor, circuit court judge, criminal court judge, or law and equity court judge, depending upon the position to which the chancellor or judge was elected or appointed prior to June 1, 1984. Any judge or chancellor may exercise by interchange, appointment, or designation the jurisdiction of any trial court other than that to which the judge or chancellor was elected or appointed.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 24.10.

Cited: Dupuis v. Hand, 814 S.W.2d 340, 1991 Tenn. LEXIS 168 (Tenn. 1991).

16-2-503. Filing and processing of actions.

Suits shall be filed in the same court and processed by the same clerk as they were filed and processed prior to September 1, 1984.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 3.

16-2-504. Selection of clerk and master — Trial court judge as chancellor.

In those judicial districts in which this part has left a particular district without a chancellor, all trial court judges within that district shall be designated as chancellors for the purpose of selecting the clerk and master. The trial court judges shall also sit as chancellors for the purpose of disposing of those cases filed in chancery court. In judicial districts in which one (1) or more chancellors remain, the clerk and master shall continue to be selected as provided by law.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 4.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 615.

16-2-505. Election of additional judges — Secretary — Courtroom security — Judicial candidates.

In any judicial district in which § 16-2-506 requires the election of an additional judge, the election shall occur in August of that year. The qualified voters of the judicial district in which the election is required shall elect a person to the office of judge for that district. That person shall possess the same qualifications, powers and duties and shall receive the same compensation, payable in the same manner, benefits, emoluments and dignity of office as is required or provided by law for other judges.

If the election occurs in 1984, 1986, or 1988, the person elected shall hold office until September 1, 1990, and until that person's successor is elected and qualified. Thereafter, a judge shall be elected for an eight-year term. At the regular August election in 1990, the qualified voters of all judicial districts required by § 16-2-506 to elect an additional judge in such year shall elect a person to such office for a full eight-year term. The person elected in 1990 as an additional judge for each such district shall possess the same qualifications, powers and duties and shall receive the same compensation, payable in the same manner, benefits, emoluments and dignity of office as is required or provided by law for other circuit court judges.

If the election occurs in 1992, 1994, or 1996, the person elected shall hold office until September 1, 1998, and until the person's successor is elected and qualified. Thereafter, a judge shall be elected for an eight-year term. At the regular August election in 1998, the qualified voters of all judicial districts required by § 16-2-506 to elect an additional judge in 1992, 1994, 1996 or 1998 shall elect a person to such office for a full eight-year term. The person elected in 1998 shall possess the same qualifications, powers and duties and shall receive the same compensation, payable in the same manner, benefits, emoluments and dignity of office as is required or provided by law for other circuit court judges or chancellors.

If the election occurs in 2000, 2002, or 2004, the person elected shall hold office until September 1, 2006, and until the person's successor is elected and qualified. Thereafter, a judge shall be elected for an eight-year term. At the regular August election in 2006, the qualified voters of all judicial districts required by § 16-2-506 to elect an additional judge in 2000, 2002, 2004 or 2006 shall elect a person to such office for a full eight-year term. The person elected in 2006 shall possess the same qualifications, powers and duties and shall receive the same compensation, payable in the same manner, benefits, emoluments and dignity of office as is required or provided by law for other circuit court judges or chancellors.

Any vacancy occurring in the office of one (1) of the circuit court judges elected pursuant to § 16-2-506 shall be filled as provided by law.

Upon the election of a judge pursuant to § 16-2-506, there is created the position of secretary for that judge. The judge shall select a suitable person to fill the position of secretary and that person shall receive the same compensation, payable in the same manner, as is provided by law for the secretary of the other judges in the district. The secretary shall perform the duties assigned by the judge.

It is the responsibility of the counties comprising the judicial district to provide a judge elected pursuant to § 16-2-506 with sufficient space and facilities in which to conduct the business and duties of the court.

Each county shall establish a court security committee composed of the county mayor, sheriff, district attorney general, the presiding judge of the judicial district and a court clerk from the county to be designated by the presiding judge, for the purpose of examining the space and facilities to determine the security needs of the courtrooms in the county in order to provide safe and secure facilities.

Upon completion of the examination of security needs, the following procedure shall be followed:

The administrative office of the courts shall distribute to each court security committee a copy of the minimum security standards as adopted by the Tennessee judicial conference, and each committee shall review and consider these standards in determining court security needs.

No later than May 15 each year, the court security committee shall report its findings to the county legislative body and the administrative office of the courts.

The county legislative body shall review and consider the recommendations of the court security committee in the preparation of each fiscal year budget.

No later than December 1 each year, the county legislative body shall report to the administrative office of the courts any action taken to meet the security needs.

No later than January 15 each year, the administrative office of the courts shall report to the general assembly on the compliance by each county government with the security needs established by the court security committee.

Any recommendation by the court security committee requiring county expenditures shall be subject to approval of the county legislative body.

Any person who seeks election to the office of circuit court judge, criminal court judge, law and equity court judge or chancellor, whether the judgeship is created by this part or was in existence on April 1, 1984, shall qualify as provided by law with the various election commissions in the counties comprising the judicial district in which the person seeks election. At the time of qualification, the person shall designate to each such commission the court and part of the court, if any, to which that person seeks election. If properly qualified, the names of all of the judicial candidates shall appear on the official ballot by the court and part of court, if any, previously designated and the candidate who shall receive the highest number of votes cast for judge of each part of each court shall be declared elected.

Acts 1984, ch. 931, § 5; 1993, ch. 506, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 225, § 1; 2001, ch. 268, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The Courtroom Security Act of 1995 is codified as subdivisions (d)(2)-(4).

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Attorney General Opinions. Funding for local court security committee, OAG 96-085 (7/2/96).

County legislative bodies' responsibility to provide court facilities, OAG 99-049 (3/2/99).

Even though T.C.A. § 16-2-505(d) does not expressly mention general sessions courts, the statute applies by necessary implication to general sessions courts to the extent that security in those facilities affects security in facilities provided circuit and chancery court judges, for example, when general sessions court is conducted in the same building as the circuit and chancery courts, OAG 02-052 (4/24/02).

Although T.C.A. § 16-2-505(d)(2) does not expressly authorize the court security committee to adopt any measures with regard to courthouse security, it is reasonable to infer that the committee may put into effect security measures affecting the security of space and facilities provided to state trial judges, so long as these measures do not require county expenditures; these measures may affect general sessions courtrooms and personnel, as well as the personnel of other offices located in the courthouse, if the measures are reasonably related to ensuring security of space and facilities provided to state trial judges, OAG 02-052 (4/24/02).

The court security committee has no authority to impose a monetary or other penalty for failure to comply with valid court security measures; however, subject to the direction of the county commission, the sheriff may exclude individuals from the courthouse who refuse to comply with reasonable security procedures, OAG 02-052 (4/24/02).

T.C.A. § 16-2-505(d)(2) is constitutional, OAG 02-052 (4/24/02).

Carrying of firearms into rooms where judicial proceedings are in progress; establishment of security committee for determining security needs of courtrooms; security training of court officers. OAG 12-32, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 32 (3/9/12).

County courthouse security and dress rules. OAG 12-107, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 111 (11/26/12).